Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

The Hermitage

4-13-101. Conveyance of property.

All property belonging to the state and known as the “Hermitage Farm,” consisting of approximately five hundred (500) acres, located in the fourth civil district of Davidson County, and being the same property referred to in Acts 1889, chapter 180, § 1 and being the same property acquired by the state by virtue of Acts 1856, chapter 96, be and the same is conveyed in trust to the Ladies' Hermitage Association, a corporation organized and chartered under the laws of the state.

The association shall be deemed the successor in interest to the Ladies' Hermitage Association board of trustees and shall assume all rights, responsibilities and liabilities of such board of trustees.

Acts 1935, ch. 79, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4976 (Williams, § 4976, note); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1301; Acts 1990, ch. 893, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The Ladies' Hermitage Association board of trustees terminated June 30, 1990. See §§4-29-112,4-29-211.

Cross-References. Abandoned cultural property, title 66, ch. 29, part 2.

Polk grave site, Jackson statue, §4-11-209.

4-13-102. Object of trust creation — Definition.

The object for which this trust is created is to permit and encourage the Ladies' Hermitage Association to preserve and beautify the property herein conveyed, in trust, and to keep the property in such state of preservation as the association may deem best so as to display the respect, love and affection that a grateful state and people cherish for their illustrious hero and statesman, Andrew Jackson.

It is furthermore the object of this trust to permit and encourage the association to do all things deemed necessary or advisable by the association to elucidate the history of the time of Andrew Jackson, his life and works and the place thereof in American history.

These activities may include, but shall not be limited to, the support of scholarly publications and other educational activities, the acquisition of related real and personal property and the maintenance and exhibition thereof.

Any property so acquired including, but not limited to, that property known as Tulip Grove, shall be held in trust in the same manner as the trust established for the Hermitage Farm in § 4-13-101.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, the association has all rights and powers in and to the property conveyed in this part and any earnings or proceeds therefrom as though the property were conveyed in fee simple absolute.

As used in this part, “association” means the Ladies' Hermitage Association.

Acts 1889, ch. 239, § 2; 1923, ch. 27, § 2; 1990, ch. 893, § 3.

4-13-103. Conditions of conveyance.

The trust conveyance described in this part is subject to the following terms and conditions:

The association may not mortgage, sell or otherwise transfer all or any part of the property conveyed in trust, with the exception of normal encumbrances for utility and other easements, without the permission of the state;

The association shall maintain its records and financial accounts in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles, shall retain such records for a period of at least five (5) years after the close of the appropriate fiscal year, and shall make such records available for audit and review by the state upon request of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designated representative;

The association shall undertake no substantial construction, alteration or modification of any structure at the Hermitage until a copy of the plans and specifications therefor has been transmitted to the state architect or the state architect's representative; and

Except as waived or modified by the state in light of the special needs of historic restoration and preservation activities, the association shall comply with all applicable state law and regulations in the use of funds appropriated by the general assembly.

Acts 1889, ch. 239, § 1; 1980, ch. 469, § 1; 1990, ch. 893, § 4.

4-13-104. Reports furnished to state.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, the association shall be required to furnish only the following reports to the state, notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary:

The association shall on an annual basis have prepared by an independent public accountant an audited financial report, which shall include, but not be limited to, a:

Balance sheet;

Statement of changes in fund balances; and

Statement of revenues and expenditures;

The association shall on an annual basis forward such audited financial report to the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury;

On an annual basis, the association shall provide to the state building commission a report on proposed property acquisition, construction, demolition, alteration, restoration or preservation works in progress, and a description of all such proposed acquisition, construction, demolition, alteration, restoration or preservation projects to be undertaken during the calendar year following the date of the report to the commission. Such reports shall include a description of the work, its purposes and sources of funding therefor. The commission shall have the authority to disapprove any property acquisition, construction, demolition, alteration, restoration or preservation project that is submitted for its review. No project may be initiated or continued without the approval of the commission;

The state architect shall review all reports and specifications submitted to the commission pursuant to § 4-13-103(3). The state architect may disapprove any plan that does not conform substantially to the corresponding plan that was submitted to the commission pursuant to this section; and

The association shall submit to the commission a copy of its bylaws and purchasing procedures, and shall also submit thirty (30) days in advance of the effective date any changes in such bylaws or purchasing procedures that from time to time may be proposed;

Any such bylaws, purchasing procedures or changes therein shall be deemed to have been accepted by the state thirty (30) days after receipt thereof by the commission;

Upon request of any member of the commission, such bylaws, purchasing procedures or changes therein shall be considered by the commission and approved or rejected on an expedited basis.

Acts 1889, ch. 239, § 4; 1990, ch. 893, § 5.

4-13-105. Revocation of trust conveyance.

In the event the association should at any time fail, neglect or refuse to preserve and beautify the premises as provided in § 4-13-102 or, in the event the association should fail to comply with the terms, conditions and reporting requirements of this part, or for any other reason, the state may revoke this trust, and, the property conveyed to the association by § 4-13-101 or acquired pursuant to § 4-13-102 shall revert and go back to the state without compensation to the association or any other person or persons, and the state shall not be required to pay any money whatever for any improvements that may have been erected on the land conveyed herein in trust.

In the event that the state decides to revoke this trust conveyance, it shall transmit to the association notice thereof signed by the governor or the governor's designee, the attorney general and reporter, the comptroller of the treasury, and the speakers of the senate and house of representatives, such notice to be effective upon receipt.

Acts 1937, ch. 120, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4988.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1303; Acts 1983, ch. 96, §§ 3, 4; 1990, ch. 893, § 6.

4-13-106 — 4-13-108. [Reserved.]

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the property conveyed in trust by § 4-13-101 or acquired pursuant to § 4-13-102 shall not be subject to controls applicable to state property until the effective date of any revocation of this trust conveyance.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit the state from providing liability, comprehensive or other insurance or any other thing of value to the association for the benefit of the property conveyed herein in trust.

Acts 1990, ch. 893, § 9; 2003, ch. 163, § 1.

4-13-110. Conveyance of all interest of board of trustees.

The right, title and interest of any real or personal property or rights of the Ladies' Hermitage Association board of trustees that have not already been conveyed to the association are hereby transferred and conveyed to the association, a corporation organized and chartered under the laws of this state, subject to the trust terms and conditions set forth in this part.

Acts 1990, ch. 893, § 10.

4-13-111. Open meetings.

Meetings of the association and its board of directors shall be open to the public.

Acts 1990, ch. 893, § 11.

Cross-References. Open meetings law, Title 8, ch. 44.